Alabama, session 2026rs, SB272.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. When any records relating to a public
contract for goods or services are requested pursuant to
Article 3 of Chapter 12 of Title 36, Code of Alabama 1975, the
public officer having custody of the records shall redact
account numbers, tax identification numbers, routing numbers,
employee identification numbers, sensitive personally
identifying information as defined in Section 8-38-2, Code of
Alabama 1975, and similar information that may be used to
initiate a financial transaction.
Section 2. (a) No person shall knowingly sell, give, or
receive any list of names and addresses contained in or
derived from public records requested from a local board of
education for the purpose of selling or offering for sale any
property or service to those individuals or entities listed
therein.
Page 1

therein.
SB272 Enrolled
(b) Any person subject to this section who knowingly
violates subsection (a) shall be liable for the payment of a
civil penalty in an action brought by the Attorney General not
to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) for each violation.
(c) If a request is made for public records that
contain the names or addresses of individuals or entities
which the public officer having custody of the records has
reasonable cause to believe may be used in violation of
subsection (a), prior to responding to the request, the public
officer may require the person requesting the records or
information therein to provide, in addition to the
certification described in Section 36-12-45(b)(3), Code of
Alabama 1975, a written certification that the requester does
not intend to, and will not:
(1) Use any list of names or addresses contained in or
derived from the records or information for the purpose of
selling or offering for sale any property or service to any
individual or entity listed or to any individual who resides
at any address listed; or
(2) Sell, give, or otherwise make available to any
person any list of names or addresses contained in or derived
from the records or information for the purpose of allowing
that person to sell or offer for sale any property or service
to any individual or entity listed or to any individual who
resides at any address listed.
(d) This section shall not impose any liability on a
public officer having custody of a record for granting access
to or providing copies of public records or information
Page 2

to or providing copies of public records or information
SB272 Enrolled
containing names and addresses, in good faith compliance with
subsection (c), to a person who has made a written request for
access to such information and has executed a written
certification pursuant to subsection (c).
(e) The State Board of Education, by rule, may provide
guidance and a model certification form for custodians of
public records to implement this section.
Section 3. This act shall become effective immediately.
Page 3

Section 3. This act shall become effective immediately.
SB272 Enrolled






________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate



________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives


SB272
Senate 19-Feb-26
I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
the Senate, as amended.

Patrick Harris,
Secretary.




House of Representatives
Amended and passed: 08-Apr-26




Senate concurred in House amendment 08-Apr-26


100
101
102 By: Senator Orr
Page 4